Alabama, session 2026rs, HB237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Notwithstanding Section 29-9-4, Code of
Alabama 1975, during the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026,
$399,150,000 is transferred from the Educational Opportunities
Reserve Fund to the Renewing Alabama's Investment in Student
Excellence (RAISE) Fund established in Section 16-13-362, Code
of Alabama 1975, to be available for appropriation and used to
provide for the continuation and expansion of the Renewing
Alabama's Investment in Student Excellence (RAISE) Act pursuant
to Article 16, Chapter 13, of Title 16, Code of Alabama 1975.
Section 2. Notwithstanding Section 29-9-4, Code of
Alabama 1975, during the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026,
$100,850,000 is transferred from the Educational Opportunities
Reserve Fund to the College and Higher Education Excellence and
Results (CHEER) Fund established by House Bill or Senate Bill
of the 2026 Regular Session, or other act of the Legislature,
to provide initial funding to implement the CHEER Act. The
provisions of this section are only effective if House Bill 565
or Senate Bill 344 of the 2026 Regular Session is enacted.
Section 3. This act shall become effective immediately
Page 1

Section 3. This act shall become effective immediately
HB237 Enrolled
following its passage and approval by the Governor, or its
otherwise becoming law.
Page 2

otherwise becoming law.
HB237 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 12-Mar-26, as amended.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 02-Apr-26 Passed



Page 3